Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 5, to read: ARTICLE 5. STATE AGENCIES START_STATUTE36-281. Administrative deficiencies; cure period; definitions A. An agency may take disciplinary or enforcement action against a facility that the agency either contracts with or licenses if only an administrative deficiency or deficiencies are identified, only if The agency allows the facility seventy-two hours to cure the identified administrative deficiency or deficiencies before the agency takes the action. b. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Administrative deficiency" means a violation that does not impact a patient or resident physically or psychosocially and that has no potential to physically or psychosocially harm the patient or resident. 2. "Agency" means the department of health services, the Arizona health care cost containment system or the department of economic security. END_STATUTE